Maine, session 132, LD1886.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2413-A, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 182, §1, is amended to
read:
§2413-A. Motor vehicle violation resulting in death or serious bodily injury
1. Offense. A person commits the civil violation of motor vehicle violation resulting
in death or serious bodily injury if that person, while operating a motor vehicle and
committing a traffic infraction, causes the death or serious bodily injury of another person.
2. Pleading and proof. The State must prove that the defendant's committing a traffic
infraction while operating a motor vehicle caused the death or serious bodily injury under
subsection 1. The court shall apply Title 17‑A, section 33 in assessing any causation under
this section.
3. Penalties. A person who violates this section commits a civil violation for which a
fine of not more than $5,000 may be adjudged. Any portion of the fine adjudged may be
satisfied by a court-ordered requirement of community service work. The court shall also
impose a license suspension of no less than 14 days and up to 4 years.
4. Definition. As used in this section, "serious bodily injury" has the same meaning
as in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 23.
Page 1 - 132LR2079(03)